 Three of my own sex gave me fifteen dollars, and I
set off for Utica, ninety-six miles, which was a long ride
for the first day. After I had gone into the Inn, a poor
 woman and three children, came to ask a drink of water.
They told her to go the bar for it, but she returned back,
saying, No one is there. My Merciful Jesus bid me
rise and carry this woman a glass of water, which I did
immediately: and while I stood by her, a solemn awe
clothed my mind, which when I sat down, affected my
 heart so much, that it seemed like a dagger run into me.
I enquired of my Master Jesus what ailed her, and He
replied, that She has no money, and thou must go and
see in the yard for her. I went directly, and saw her
wringing her hands in the yard, crying out, Whatever
 shall I do? whatever shall I do?What is the matter
 with thee? said I, to which she answered, I am here a
 stranger, and know not any person, and I have not one
 shilling in the world, and have one hundrend miles to go,
to my husband, who is at a new plantation. I have come
one hundred miles, where we have moved from, and yes-
terday I had my pocket book, with my money; but have
lost it, and yet I know not how or where! I went into
supper, being sent for, with a pitiful tale, to the company
 who eat with me, which consisted of eight merchants, and
one female; but no impression could be made on any
heart, by my arguments of wo, to alleviate the wretched
situation of this poor woman, and her three children!
 therefore, my Gracious God moved my soul to go and give
her a part of my money, with this message, I can but
tell thee of one Friend, and that is God; take this money,
and He who has provided this for thee to-day, will pro-
vide for thee to-morrow: trust in Him. I suppose this
person was as much astonished as she could be; for she
 had got into the waggon to set off, the sun being gone
down. What a compassionate Friend is our Heavenly
Father! and how mindful is He of all His creatures, who
are scattered up and down over the earth! having always
servants at hand, to do His Work for Him; unless He in-
tends to honour any of His children, with His extraordina-
ry Love, as He did when He led through the Red Sea six
hundred thousand men, besides women and children, for
whom the waves divided at the Presence of Jehovah, who
appointed them at the first their secret bars. The 26th I got to Vernon, and was introduced to Cal-
vin Young, who was Innkeeper there. The stranger that
requested Calvin Young to be a father to me, came pas-
senger from Utica, and was like a brother to me, reward-
ing the mercy I manifested the day before. How many
times we lose the blessing of God, for want of searching
out the miseries of mankind, and supplying them out of
our little stock, which is the Lord’s, to do his Will! The 27th of 7th mo. 1805, Calvin Young said he would
go with me to Oneida Castle, to see the Indians of the Six
Nations, and particularly Skanando , the oldest Chief, who
was a great favourite of his, from his sobriety. Before I 
went, I enquired of Calvin Young , what I was in debt to
him, having had lodgings and three meals: but his answer
was, I am paid. Who has paid thee? said I; my friend
replied, All I have is lent, and so long as you can be of
service to the Indians, you are welcome to stay at my
house as a daughter; and I will be to you as a father.
This so astonished me, that I could not say more than
this at the time, I am glad thou dost consider all though
hast as lent; he then assured me, that I Was welcome
to a horse, or a chaise, and that I should have the compa-
ny of him, or his wife, or daughters, any time when I
wanted to ride out; so that I was humbled to the dust,
and saw the fulfilment of the promise of the Lord imme-
diately; for this man was no professor of religion, but
stumbling thereat; because the ministers who were in
this part, he said, Were no better than others, and if he
ever were converted it should be by a woman’s preaching,
which gave me to believe the Lord had sent me to his
house to seek after his precious soul, being a merciful
kind-hearted man. We had a pleasant ride to the Chief’s
house, which was a good framed building of wood, paint-
ed red, two stories high, and two rooms on a floor.Ska-
nando, the Chief, was pleased to see me and shewed me
his wife, introduced his children, grand-children, and
great-grand-children with joy and happiness, such I pre-
sume, as we do not expect, when we look at their condi-
tion, as the heathen. Skanando tried to number is pos-
terity by counting his fingers many times over, and then
laughed heartily, and cried out, I cannot tell: for I made
this enquiry, How many children, and grand-children
hast though? My soul was so highly gratified, that I gave
Skanando a pair of red stone silver buttons, which was
the only thing I had belonging to my honored mother,
who was dead: for the Chief had a shirt on, with his
sleeves hanging loose, and was without any coat at this
time. He was ninety five, or six years old, and put his
hands together, desiring to live to be one hundred; lifting
up his eyes to Heaven, with a blessed smile. My friend 
/>C. Young told me that Skanando was never once intoxi-
cated, and was looked unto with great respect as king of
those Six Nations. The wife of this Chief went into the
garden and plucked me seven ears of corn just ripe,
saying, Seven is a goodly number, must have seven:
being pleased with some spoons and coffee, with a tin
boiler, which I had given her. I told my friend Calvin
Young to leave me till the evening, among them, and
I would go from hut to hut: so he did, and I went to one
house which was very neat, with a curtain bed, whose
husband was a Frenchman, and she was handsome, and
had some beautiful children: but was very dirty for
want of washing herself, which I made a move for her to
do. I was happy to see my friend, when he came for me;
having not to eat any thing all the day; and rejoiced much
in my heart, that my eyes have seen this people, which had
many times been shown me in a vision by the Lord, who
has brought me here to see a part of the workmanship of
His Hand; whom our Lord Jesus Christ died for, when
He yielded up His Soul an Offering for sin: but I was
much distressed with seeing number of drunken In-
dins, who came this night and lay in the ditch: I thought
the devil sent them; for they came and lay down close
by the Inn where I was. I counted six who were yelling
like wild beasts; and had it not been for the goodness of
my God, who sent a number of young neat squaws, well
dressed on horse back, I think my mind would not have
been able to support under the wretchedness of those
miserable Indians, who were leveled with the beasts by
their shameful conduct. One woman, of the name of Tally , was among the
squaws, who came early this morning, and she told me,
that She had been to see a new prophet , which has risen
up from among an Indian tribe two hundred miles off.
Tally said that this prophet told her, He was formerly
very wicked and much given to strong drink; but being
sick for three years, he became sober, and one day as he
sat by the bed side, one knocked at the for, which the 
prophet opened, and saw a person standing, who enquired
if he loved God? to which the prophet answered, Yes I
do, then said the stranger, You must go with me, to
which the prophet agreed and went out, and saw other two,
like the person who rapped at the door, who joined
them, which he believes to be three angels. The old In-
dian prophet said, that after they led him some distance
from his habitation, they commanded him to look down,
where was presented to his view Jesus crucified, which he
gazed at some time. Tally the stopped, and hung down
her head with eyes full of teas, that she prevented with
her fingers, until the fountains flowed, over, which affect-
ed me so much, that I gave her my handkerchief to wipe
the tears away, saying, Tally , keep it for my sake: be-
lieving she was sensible of the Love of a Dying Jesus.
We both sat silent, weeping very much, and I felt my
soul drawn out in fervent supplication that this young
Indian woman might feel the virtue of his Death. What
undescribable peace did I feel, while hearing of the con-
version of this pagan? how was my soul overcome with
love also to Tally , whom I requested to proceed when
the torrent had got vent from her eyes? I never felt be-
fore as at this time, when we wept in solemn silence, re-
specting the Crucifixion of the Blessed Jesus. At last
Tally broke the silence, lifting up her head, and open-
ing her eyes, The angels, said Tally , led the prophet
further, and shewed him a large pit, which was called hell,
where he saw the wicked fight, and quarrel, while they
appeared drinking and in wickedness, as on earth. After
this he was conducted to a place of happiness, called
Heaven, where he saw God the Father, and Jesus Christ,
sitting at His Right Hand of Glory in perfect bliss, among
the angels.. Tally intimated, that the prophet did not
continue long in this blessed state, but was conveyed
back again by the angels, to his own house, where they left
him, commanding him to Refrain from sin, and go and
preach to his brethren the Indians. I asked Tally how
long she was at this prophet’s house? and she answered, 
Three days and had this advice from him, her husband
being present, We were not to drink, lie, cheat, nor
steal, to correct our children, but not to whip them too
much; and when any of our Nation was sick, we must
visit, and be kind to them. It was last summer that Tal-
ly was there with her husband. She also added, When
the old prophet goes out to preach, he has thirty Indians
to protect him from the rage of such as may oppose him. I have long believed in the ministration of angels, and
this is as great a proof as any I have heard of in my travels
among the heathen: for those only believe in God, as a
Great Spirit. Tally , the Indian squaw, is a respectable
woman, ad can speak English well; for she was several
years with a Quaker’s family, who took great pains with
her. 28th 7th mo. 1805. This morning at break of day, I
found my soul drawn out to pray for the Pagan Indians,
who never worship God but once a year, believing only in
the Great Spirit. Calvin Young , and his daughter Peggy ,
with several more went with me; I suppose there were
ten horses went through the woods, for the purpose of
going to what is called the South Settlement , where the
Chief, Blacksmith , nigh an hundred years old, and many
more gathered to meet me, for morning worship. The
Pagan chief was glad to see me, because he thought it was
a true mark of friendship coming there, as they did not
assemble to worship with those in Oneida Castle, where
there is a good house built for the purpose of gathering to-
gether every Sabbath. I never was more affected that I
know in my life: for this old chief, no doubt, was a real
Pagan within, as well as outwardly so, and was the
strangest figure I ever beheld. Black darkness, I thought,
covered his mind; and he appeared as a beast of the earth:
yet he conducted himself respectfully to me, smoking his
pipe all the time of our being together, accompanied with
several younger Chiefs and night forty Indian men, and
aged women. Before our worship commenced, he got hold
of my hand, having it for some time as fast as possible 
while he stamped earnestly with his feet at the white
preachers, whom he said, are Friendly to us, till they get
our trees, and lands, and then they are no more our friends;
but the Quakers are good people, and do not serve us so;
I love the Quakers, nipping my hands almost together,
until I was actually afraid of him, his visage was so hor-
rible, while he stamped on the ground at the white preach-
ers, whom he would not let come near him. I kneeled
down in the midst of them in fervent supplication, while
they sat on seats all round in the place where they offer
their yearly sacrifice. A large pole was standing up,
on which they fix a white dog, night the top, and then
dance round it, imploring the Good Spirit to give them a
plentiful crop of corn, from that which is just before put
into the ground; rendering Him their thanks for His bless-
ing upon the past crop the preceding summer. They have
another white dog which they roast, and eat at the same
time, of their sacrifice, that are instead of lambs. The
ardour of my soul was great for them, that they might
worship the Eternal Spirit, through the medium of His
Only Begotten Son. The text I spoke from was, Alas,
my brother! which was opened to me, by the Revealing
Light, so far, as to enable me to testify to them, that I be-
lieved they were of Jeroboam’s house, who were Israel’s
seed, that were carried away captives by Shalmaneser,
king of Assyria, and so were come thither to keep their
sacrifices, which were to typify Jesus the Son of God, who
was offered up for them, and would call them back again
into their own land, that should flow with milk and honey,
and they should all be taught of God, who would be a
Righteous King unto them, and join them to Judah, from
whom they were separated for rebellion. I also signified,
that their forefathers were carried away by Shalmaneser
captives, because they worshipped two Golden calves,
which my Interpreter said was made of “Yellow money,”
that they might understand the better: for he was a good
Indian, who was a religious man, and of the Tuskerow
nation, and spoke English well, as also Indian: but there 
wanted animation in his delivery, which was a great dis-
advantage; nevertheless they were very attentive, and
fully satisfied by Doctor Peter’s Energetic Speech, that
indicated, They were thankful that the Good Spirit
had sent me over the Great Water to visit them; and they
hoped the Great Spirit would take care of me; and con-
duct me safe back again to my own native place, request-
ing another visit from me next Sabbath morning if I would
indulge them with my company. Doctor Peter was a
Chief, as well as their Speaker, and delivered their speech
of gratitude with great punctuality, which I lament on
account of not having it translated. Blacksmith , the old
Pagan Chief, was highly pleased with my prayer, and
sermon, and desired the favour of my Coming again,
when I bid him adieu. His ears were slit, and hanging
down, and his forehead, nose, cheeks, and chin were paint-
ed red: he had a hairy cap on, with a red tail half a yard
long, with a yellow striped ruffled dress, that came down
to his feet, and the sleeves thereof to his fingers, bowed
together with age, having on his brest a large ornament
life a half moon of silver. In this part, they who knew
him, said that he thought the white people devils, because
they never were infested with rats, or crows, till they
settled round them. To my eye, he appeared a complete
savage: and I venture to say, the remembrance of him in
time will never wear off, I was filled with such dread awe
while he described the white preachers to me, and I hope
his situation will arouse me to pray for the completion of
those promises respecting Jesus Christ, He shall take
the heathen for His Heritage, and the uttermost part of
the earth for His Possession. And all shall know the
Lord, from the least to the greatest. In the afternoons, I went two miles to the other settle-
ment of Indians, on the Oneidaground, where numbers
collected together with the Indians, and my Interpreter
went for the purpose of relieving my anxiety, which was
great, from a desire to benefit those whom the Lord my
God had caused me to sow in tears for ever since I was a 
child; leading me in spirit, to contemplate the awful con-
dition both of the house of Judah and Israel, who are trod-
den under foot until the fulness of the Gentiles. The
subject I was led to swell on, was these words of Jesus,
And He shall set the sheep on His right Hand, but the
goats on His left. I could not forbear remarking, what
a solemn aspect the Indians wore, and especially the
women, who sat pensively weeping, paying great attention
to the sentences, as they flowed from my lips. I never
had an Interpreter before this day, and was astonished
how the words stopped as soon as the sentence was finish-
ed, which confirmed me that Jesus Christ lived in me, and
spake through my mouth. I have marveled at the assist-
ance of my Gracious Master, this day more than any
other: because He stopped the stream, and caused it to
flow just as was necessary for them to receive, through
the interpretation of the Tuskarow Indian. After I had
given a suitable portion to my Indian brethren and sisters,
I then addressed the white people present, and had great
liberty to pray with each; believing the Lord would an-
swer my ardent supplication in behalf of such as desired
to be instructed. In the evening I held the third meeting at Vernon, in
a new large barn, belonging to my kind friend Calvin
Young, which contorted his spirit among the rest who
were deeply affected under the Power of that God, who
sends by whom He will and uses the most feeble instru-
ments to glorify His Name, which is had in remembrance
by all who revere His Majestic Person, for His Mercy,
Love and Justice. This was large gathering, and my
heart was filled with thankfulness that the Lord had fur-
nished me with strength to go from one part to another
this day, and at the close to enable me, in His Fear, to
testify, Her ways are ways of pleasantness, and all Her
paths peace, thus Wisdom was honoured with the Lord
my God, who has prepared my way, and given me an in-
crease of Faith in Him for this people, whom my lot is
cast among. My friends followed me this day from the South Settle-
ment of Pagans, to the Oneida Indians, and from thence
back again to the Barn, which is the first I ever preached
in; an din this small village we had at least three hundred
people assembled, of whom were many deeply humbled at
the goodness of my Master, that was mouth and Wisdom
to me at each different place. I feel myself much obliged
to all who have accompanied me, being a lonely stranger,
but more especially to those who prepared my way, and
found me a horse to ride through the woods. May the
God of Jacob return it back again upon their posterity;
and keep in remembrance my desire to please Him, and
profit every individual who has sat under the sound of
His Gospel, which was sanctioned by His Adorable Pre-
sense. [Vernon, Oneida County, 20th 7th mo. 1805.] I went out to the other end of the village to have a
meeting in a school-house, where many assembled to wor-
ship God, and hear a stranger. May the blessing of the
Highest attend my feeble efforts, for without this, in vain
will my labour prove: yet, I am of opinion, that my work
will have its reward in that day, when every secret thing
shall be made public to all Nations, and this my love, for
the salvation of precious souls. I can appeal to Thee, my
God, who art the Searcher of all hearts, that the Kingdom
of Jesus Christ is my glory, yea, my chiefest joy,that ab-
sorbs all my powers of soul and body. When I came
from New York, it was to suffer Thy Will; trusting for
mercy from Thy Endless Liberality, that has thus far pre-
pared the hears of the people to receive my labour, and
entertain me as a messenger sent out from God, the Father
of our Lord Jesus, and the whole family of Heaven and
earth. Any one who depends upon God, doing His Special
Work, will acknowledge that He is with me to provide my
daily bread, as occasion requires, which is according to
His ancient promise, “They that Fear the Lord shall
lack no good thing.” The Love of God to His children is
great; how am I made sensible of His Fatherly Care at 
this time! when I am as in a wilderness, far from my na-
tive land, and all who were once dear to me by the ties of
friendship, and my honoured father’s house. The Lord
assured me He would come along with me, to prepare my
way, and prosper my goings: and I can say, thus far His
Promises are fulfilled to the joy of my heart. Yesterday I went to the Indian Castle alone, and walked
from one cottage to another, till I had a number of women
to join in supplication with me, and feeling great sorrow
of heart on their account, I besought the Benign Parent
of us each, to open their blind eyes, that they might see
Jesus, the Saviour of His people; and believe in Him,
who is the Light of the world. I felt great refreshment
in my spirit thereby, and a hope that He who is merciful
will meet those after their own way, and according to
His unbounded Love and Goodness, which is manifested
in and through His Son Jesus. They were very solemn,
and sat as still as possible during the time of prayer,
while the tears trickled down their cheeks. When I arose
they each lifted up their eyes to Heaven, and then looking
earnestly at me, lay their hands on their breasts or hearts,
still melted in tenderness in my presence, and gave me to
understand that they knew something of the God whom I
approached, and felt what was said, though it was not in
their language, and they knew not mine. We parted in
much affection, and I returned home to my friend Young’s ,
and was thankful that I could go and refresh my body
with the comforts of life, having fasted from morning to night. I am no ways calculated to live as the Indian squaws;
yet believe the Lord can enable me to endure great hard-
ship if He sees meet to call me to work in that part of
His vineyard, or soften my sorrows, and assuage my grief,
by supplying me bountifully, as at this time by His extra-
ordinary kindness, sending me help from a quarter that I
might the least expect. I conclude the day with holy
aspirations to the Giver of all my Mercies, for His Spirit
to whisper peace, and free salvation unto all this people,
who appear in a forlorn condition. The number of Indians here a bouts are seven or eight
hundred; but those tribes have been greatly diminished,
through the wicked white people introducing strong drink
among them, to defraud and take every advantage of their
weakness and gross ignorance. Was not the Merciful
God to provide a little food for them, as He does for the
birds of the air, they must utterly perish from off the face
of the earth, being almost strangers to economy and in-
dustry; which two things, enrich the most miserable na-
tions, when the Blessing of Heaven is upon their basket
and store. [1st 8th mo. 1805.] Every day brings me nearer my mansion of bliss, that
 is prepared for me to dwell in at God's Right Hand. In
 all my conflicts betwixt flesh and spirit, the world
 and satan, my prospect is sure: for a determination is in my 
 soul, through Christ's strengthening me, to abide faithful.
Fiery baptisms are my lot here; but they all tend to make
 me more complete in holiness; more like the Image of my 
Lord and Master. Earthly joys cannot delight me; no,
it is the salvation of the lost sons and daughters of Adam,
that I am comforted with: therefore, O my god! give me
 seals to my ministry, that I may rejoice therein, and be a
useful instrument in my day and generation. Thou art
growing up in me, and I shall be perfect by Thy Spirit's
 Covering, by Thy Robe of Righteousness put around me.
How beautiful will the King's Duaghter be then! How
 comely to the eye! How precious in His Sight! no cross,
no suffering shall I decline; moving by His direction, and
submitting to His justice, when His holy fire burns up the
dross of sin, that remains from the contaminating influ-
ence of satan, whose dark influence is poured forth all
around this world, while he walks up and down, to and
fro, seeking whom he may overturn or devour. Calvin Young lent me his chaise this morning, to go
to see the Christian Chief Skanando , who was very glad
to see me again, and told me he was formerly a warrior,
and shewed me how his ears were cut in the midst, and
his neck with powder marked to distinguish him thereby, 
which he said made him shriek aloud. Such things as I
could spare, I took and divided among them, trusting in
the Lord for a future supply, knowing all fulness is in
Him. The women were well pleased to accept of my
linen shifts, which I spun in England, and told me they
would make gowns of them, as they do without under gar-
ments, and almost every necessary of apparel, we conceive
that we want. Some Christian professing sisters, who
abound in garments and gold and silver, charged me thus,
as I was coming along, You must take care of your trunks
and clothes; for the Indians are great thieves, they will
steal what you have. I answered, I mean to save them
the trouble of stealing my clothes, for I shall give them,
and so have taken the first opportunity to disperse abroad
whatever I have, believing it my duty to try to gain their
affection by shewing disinterestedness unto them, while I
am here. The women opened their boxes and shewed
me all they had, which surprised some of the white people
so much, that they said, We have seen more of the In-
dians since you came than we have for years, while we
have lived in their neighbourhood: for they do not put con-
fidence in us, as they do in you. I anwered, I do not
wonder they can trust me, as I have prayed for them
many years; and have shed thousands of tears for their
miserable situation. Marks of their gratitude, in being
thankful for the smallest favours, cheered my heart, and
revived my spirits for a few moments; but on comparing
my line of inheritance with theirs, I was ready to sink
into despair, and was overwhelmed in the midst of them:
however, I again bowed in the Presence of Him, who is
our Wise Creator, and besought His Divine Favour, and
the Light of His Reconciling Countenance to shine upon
their dark minds. My heart was truly affected while
praying with them, lamenting the disadvantage they la-
boured under for want of cultivation, both in spiritual and
natural things: but I was sharply reproved by the Lord
with this language, The foolishness of God is wiser than
the wisdom of men. I learnt by His Spirit, that He had 
placed them so remote in the earth, that they might evi-
dence The foolishness of God, that should display
itself in His time Wiser than the wisdom of men.
Thus did I return home weeping, with perfect acquiescence
to His hidden mystery, while I remained silent, and full
of sorrow, having my mind awed through the rebuke of
the King of Saints, and was afterwards abundantly filled
with praise and love, to my Creator, for His Distinguish-
ing Mercies, that I have partook of all my life long to the
present: and I desire every breath to utter forth thanks,
which are due to His Great Name: and to tell of His
Loving Kindness in chastening my foolish heart, that
would dispute, and judge His Marvellous Providence, who
has required of my hands diligence, obedience, and a
faithful reliance on His Promises; that I may perform His
Sovereign Will, and answer His Divine Purpose, as a child
of His Widom, who shall be justified at the last in the
sight of all Nations, having suffered his Will, and done
all which the Lord my God appointed, while among mu-
table creatures; born to give account at the last for
every thought, word, and action in time. [3d 8th mo. 1805,
Vernon, Oneida County.] This morning, my friend Eve Young , went with me to
Judge Dean’s , to ask if he would interpret for me, as he
knew the Indian language, being among them much when
a child; he said, Few know an Indian’s heart, but I do;
and I think, they are not of the same species which we are.
I smiled with contempt at his opinion, believing the Lord
will visit them with gracious outpouring of His Spirit;
then shall it be evidenced, their genius, or mental powers,
are bright as ours: and that their hearts are as suscepti-
ble of divine impressions: for my part, I believe many of
them are wrought upon by the Light, but heir dwelling in
the woods obscurely, have made them appear in the eyes
of men, almost like the brute creation. The white peo-
ple, who are of a bad principle, receive their clothes, and
small necessaries for rum, or money to procure it, which
I think should be severely punished. There is a fine for 
taking advantage over them by selling rum to them, but
it is so trifling, that it is not regarded by the wicked pro-
fessors of Christianity. One poor Indian came into one of
those professing Christian’s house, with a brass candlestick,
that was worth four shillings sterling, and begged two shil-
ling loaves of bread for it, but the inhuman woman only
gave him one loaf, which I was ashamed at, and am sorry
that she is the mother of children; knowing this is not
the way to secure bread here for them, neither lay up
riches in Eternity, which will not wax old. I was invit-
ed to stay there, and was told by this person, that the
man where I stayed was a deist: but I answered, He
acts like a Christian to me, being merciful. What a
strange view must the Indians have of the Christian reli-
gion; no wonder they do refuse to practise it, and dare
not place confidence in the fruitless professors: for it
must be acknowledged, that they have made many of the
Indians two fold more the children of the devil, by bring-
ing strong drink unto them, and setting an example of
wickedness before their eyes, which a Holy God will
punish them severely for, as they were taught to believe
Jesus Christ has Died to take away sin: and can avail
themselves with the privilege of reading the inspired writ-
ings of Moses and the Prophets, and the Miracles of our
Lord and Saviour, who crowned His life with Mercy, Love,
and Righteousness, and His followers must obey Him if
they worship His Sceptre of holiness, that rules in the
heart of every believer who submits to the Government
of King Immanuel, the Prince of Peace. I was not sorry that Judge Dean gave me a refusal:
for as soon as I saw him, it passed through my mind, that
he was not a suitable person to administer spiritual com-
fort; he might do to make treaties, and receive of their
lands a reward, if they were disposed to trust him so far.
Our riding eighteen miles, will not lose its reward of the
Lord my God, who has heard the sentiments of this wise
man, respecting his poor Indian brethren: and I have no
doubt, when all Nations are at the Bar of the Eternal 
Judge, that he will see those stand with him there, although
he thinks they are not of the same species with us. God
grant that none of them may rise up to condemn him in
the awful day of Judgment, when all shall receive ac-
cording to the mercy they manifest in this world. [4th 8th
mo. 1805, Vernon, Oneida County, New York State.] As I continued in this part, I went among the Pagans
again, and sat in silence with them sometime at the pale
where I held the last meeting. All the week I had tra-
vailled in my spirit for Blacksmith , the Chief, who was
nigh an hundred years old, and in a state of gross dark-
ness, which has bowed down my mind in awful silence
before God, during the last night, that I might be a Sa-
vour of life unto him, and a sweet smelling Savour to the
Lord my God, who has crowned my life with His Loving
Kindness, and Rich Mercy, from the consequence of being
offered unto Him before I was born, by a man of faith, to
succeed him in his Gospel Labour; for, before he expired,
he cried out, When you are doing well, if it be possible,
I will look down from Heaven, and smile on you, which
has come into my mind at this present moment, expecting
this little service of mine will give additional pleasure to
him, from whose loins I proceeded, to glorify his God
and mine, in the regions of blessedness, when time is swal-
lowed up in Eternity. The Old Chief received me with cordiality; but my
Interpreter was gone a long journey, and I had to apply
to the Spirit to make them understand, as He did by the
same Spirit in the day of Pentecost, when they all had the
revelation of Jesus Christ made manifest in their hearts
through the outpouring of the Spirit, while they were as-
sembled together. As I was praying, my desire was
very great for the Salvation of their precious souls; and I
saw the heart of Blacksmith exceeding hard and dark,
like a beast’s heart, such as King Nebuchadnezzar’s when
in his state of degradation in the field grazing: but con-
tinuing in supplication with great ardency of sprite, the
Lord shewed me, through His Revealing Power, that He 
would give him a new heart, or change his nature to grace,
and clothe him with His own Spirit, which I have no
doubt concerning, as the Lord is more ready to shew
mercy than we are to accept it. I have faith to believe
God will convert this man, and my desire is, that I may
never forget his situation, till he is a changed, renewed
creature, to glorify King Jesus, who shall reign over the
Heritage of the heathen, and Rule them with His Righte-
ous Sceptre to endless Ages. I took my leave of this part
of the Indians, called the Pagan party: and had the plea-
sure of seeing them well satisfied with my labour of love,
which I am thankful for; knowing my God will give
His Blessing thereunto, as well as cause them to hear
with the utmost attention, all paying respect unto my
ministration, by their act of friendship, in smoking their
pipes till I had finished, which as it is their distinguish-
able mark of approbation to testify their love, I can, in as
much charity receive it, as any other custom or form
among the professing Christians; whereby they manifest
their sincerity or gratitude: for I am fully convinced
that our God looks beyond all forms, customs, and appear-
ances outwardly; and regardeth the motives which in-
fluence man, whether they are good or bad; therefore the
heathens, He will judge as such, and the Christians after
their profession; yet, know, O man! no act of mercy,
love, or obedience to His Spirit, which is in every one ac-
cording to their mental ability, shall go unnoticed by the
Father of all Nations, whose prerogative alone it is to
weigh all thoughts, words, or actions; seeing all hearts,
and knowing all things from Eternity to Eternity. After I went to my lodgings, I set off three miles, to
attend an appointment, which I had engaged for five this
evening; and I am thankful I can say, my Great Master
that He was made a Mock King for our sakes, although
Heaven was His Throne, and Earth His Footstool. His
submitting to have His Back scourged by Pilate, who made
long furrows thereon, affected me so much, that I could 
have spent my last breath testifying of His Dying Love
to all people, created by His Inimitable Widom, who
formed all flesh for His own pleasure, and man for His
special Glory, so that it is no wonder that He should lay
down His own Life to influence them to serve, love, and
adore Him, as their Lord and God forever, having not on-
ly Power to take up His own Life again on the third day,
according to the prophecy, or sign of Jonah the prophet,
but also is the Resurrection, or Life, of all who are in the
tomb, waiting for His Voice to call them forth, when the
Mystery of Righteousness is fulfilled, and the Kingdom
of our Lord Jesus Christ completed, so that there requireth
no longer an High Priest to atone for sin: but He shall
be adored as God over all, by the seed whom He has re-
deemed through the Spilling of His Most Precious Blood,
an eternal sign to them of His Merit and Soverign Love,
which undertook the cause of all, to reinstate them
in paradisiacal happiness, which was lost when satan beguil-
ed our first parents, when the milk of human kindness
flowed from each heart, to one another; and innocence
was sealed on their forehead, as a mark of divine favour,
which they lost the moment they both transgressed, and
found they were naked, having bereaved themselves of
inherent Righteousness, that might be compared to Life
Eternal, which is found only in Jesus Christ, the Second
Adam, whose Life is diffused into every true believer on
His Name, who calls Himself the Resurrection and Life. [6th 8th mo. 1805. Vernon, Oneida.] Yesterday Peggy Young , daughter of Calvin and Eve
Young, rode with me nine miles further to the West, to
have a meeting with a Presbyterian congregation. As
we were going the horse stopped al on a sudden, and
would not go one step, but as I expected we both should
be thrown out, as we ere on the midst of a hill, which
scared my dear companion so much that I was obliged to
force her to jump out of the chaise, to prevent her fainting
away, which she did, as she reached her father’s residence,
running thither for some one to make the horse move. 
When my dear young friend was going, I feel a weeping,
thinking my case very hard: but as my tears were flow-
ing from a heart, which desired to know the Will of God,
it immediately passed through my mind that Balaam’s
Ass, would not go once because an angel stood before it
with a drawn sword; I therefore besought the Lord to
reveal His Will to me, that I might know why the horse
would stand still there; and the answer was, I do not
want thee to go further West than Oneida, where the
Indians are. Astonished at this salute, I recollected, that
the week before, I had a meeting appointed at the same
house for worship, and such a heavy rain came, that no
person could go with me, and I knew not the road, so put
it by saying, I would go next week, but I suppose, did
not either add If God permit, or else forgot to enquire
of the Lord whether I should accept this offer, yea, or
nay, begin solicited to go fifty miles further, to appoint
meetings all round the neighbourhood. With dread awe,
I ventured to request the Lord to permit me to go and
fulfil my engagement, in pity to the people, acknowledg-
ing my folly, in hastily complying to go any where un-
sent of Him; also acquiescing with His Providential
Will, who had limited me to answer His own purpose,
which I should find was right when I saw it fulfiled; and
in order to shew my willingness to comply with His Di-
vine command, I agreed to eat no bread there, if He re-
quires me to return back the nine miles in the evening;
to which was answered, Thou mayest go if thou wilt ap-
point no more meetings there, and immediately my
horse started without my speaking; and I went back for
the dear young woman, who had been in a fainting fit all
the time that the direction of God was given me. She
was so alarmed, that I expected I should be obliged to go
without her, but as I assured her no further harm would
befall us, and I would not stay there all night, once more
she resumed her office, and was a very pleasant companion
to me although not Born again, the second time. Very
short notice collected the people, who were disappointed 
the last week: but while I sat with them in silence, they
kept whispering all the time, which made me bow in
reverential awe before God, and afterwards in the name
of the Lord commanded all thus, Watch therefore, for
ye know neither the day, nor the hour wherein the Son
of man cometh. The foolish virgins were awfully set
before me, and it appeared that individuals there would
be in the situation at the last; and I should witness
against them, having exhorted them to a preparation by
inforcing the necessity of furnishing their vessels with
spiritual oil; that is, get grace in their hearts, that their
lamps of profession may burn bright; testifying to them,
that some present, and a lamp of profession, but no oil
in their vessels, and therefore their light did not shine,
signifying now was their day of visitation; now the best
time to apply for spiritual oil in their soul and body. As
the minister was present, I observed to him, how impro-
per it was for the people to whisper while were were silent-
ly waiting on the Lord: but he made a very handsome
apology for them, by saying, They are not accustom-
ed to this manner of worship, and thought the meeting
did not begin, till the minister begun. I begged him to
reprove them, as I was not at liberty to make any re-
mark on their conduct, having to exhort them to the pur-
suit of righteousness, by an ample supply of grace, which
was free for all, who sought the Lord while He may be
found. We got safe home, and I feel thankful that the God
of Jacob preserved our lives; and I am fully satisfied with
my journey, and can assign a sufficient reason at the close
of this day, why I was stopped on the road, which I have
learnt from an Indian, who has come to inquire, Why I
did not go to Stockbridge, four miles off, yesterday? as
the hunters, and the fishing Indians stayed at home, hav-
ing being informed, that I intended going there; which was
a mistake from some who took a wrong message. In all
my ways may I acknowledge the Hand of Jehovah, which
guards my naked head. In peace I shall lay down this night, with a conscience
void of offence towards God and man; desiring to walk
humbly all the days of my pilgrimage, while a resident of
time. I went to-day to take my leave of the Indians settled
on the Oneida ground. which is a beautiful tract of land,
and I could not but notice how love to them unites my
heart to the Lord more abundantly; for, He delights in
His creatures shewing mercy one to another. An Indian
woman lent me her horse to ride on, from one hut to the
other, till I paid many visits: but, not being accustomed
to ride on horseback without saddle or pillion, the horse
was going to throw me off, which perceiving, I took the
advantage of the creature, and jumped several yards, and
it was out of sight before I recovered from the surprise
and stun that I received by falling heavy on the ground
after I alighted: but even in this instance, I have to say,
the Delivering Hand of god was ready to assist in this
solitary place, when only a little Indian boy was with me;
for, on looking behind me I saw a chaise, with two men,
advancing forward as fast as possible; having seen me fly,
and the horse take its departure, who cried out to me,
while I sat on the ground, Don’t go after the horse; we
will go after it, and the youngest lifted me into the
chaise and then enquired where I was going, and set me
safe at the cottage, with the politeness of Christians or mer-
ciful men, which I praise God on the account; and that
my bones were not broken by His not suffering me to dash
myself against a stone, believing death, and ten thousand
dangers at all times, surrounded all mortals. I was greatly led into sympathy with my Indian sisters,
and their little helpless infants, whom with pleasure I could
aid, was the Lord to give ability to heart filled with
generous sentiments to all His offspring. The women
brought me some Indian corn bread, with large beans stuck
all over it, which I thought were raisins: but, found my
mistakes as soon as I took one: and it being very sad, and
boiled, I chose to fast all day till night, rather than eat it; 
which suited one of my poor sisters very well: for, observ-
ing my uncommon delicacy, she looked at me, and made
me understand that she was hungry, and could it fast
enough; so I gave it to her, and she wrapped it up as the
richest dainty with thankfulness, which was a lesson I
mean ever to to remember, while I sojourn below. In returning home alone I saw a number of Indians
lying all their length on the ground, with a small fire in
the midst, smoking their pipes; and as I looked up to Hea-
ven, for a blessing to come upon them through an outpour-
ing of His Spirit, they all cried, Sago, sago, which I
accepted as a salutation of their love. I might, and should
have been alarmed at this sight of miserable looking men,
had not my mind recollected, that I felt love, and good will
to all; neither would I injure a worm, could I pass by it
I had no other companion that day; for I thought I would
try and go alone, which I did several other times, unno-
ticed here; and I feel thankful, that I can say some of bad
disposition said, No Indian hurt you, need not fear them:
which, I answered, that I believe; for I love, and pray for
them all. [7th 8th mo. 1805, Vernon, Oneida County.] A solitary ride of twelve miles has been my lot to-day,
being scarcely able to sit up all the time: and as I was go-
ing I heard a terrible howling, which threw a damp on my
spirit; but pursuing further my journey a drunken Indian
of the Pagan party, advanced me, crying out like one al-
most scared to death, stung with remorse and the rebuke
of the Spirit. I stopped the chaise, and hearkened to what
he had to say, which was, Lord! Lord! you madam, you
madam, and then he remained silent; for he was quite asham-
ed of his conduct, having a few days before made me believe
that he felt very good when I was preaching among the
Pagans, telling me where, by laying his hands on his
breast; bemoaning at the same time, that he had no one to
boil his pot; for his wife was killed by one of the wicked
Indians, who pretended she was a witch; he told me they
came and took him a great distance; and then went into 
his log house and knocked her down with an axe: but be-
ing a strong woman, she got up again, and endeavoured
to make her escape from those instruments of cruelty, who
cut her throat from ear to ear, and then buried her, and
laying earth several inches deep over her, made a fire on
the earth to burn out the spirit of witchcraft that they said
was in her. Two women were served thus by this wick-
ed Indian, who pretended to be wiser than his brethren.
This circumstance happened two years ago. I passed by
his house, that was desolate: for he was hated by the rest
of his brethren, and obliged to leave the place. A third
woman was condemned to die for witchcraft, but being
innocent, and willing to die, she desired that they would
let her dress herself, that she might die decently: so they
let her put on a white gown, which after she had done, she
then said, I am willing to die, but my blood will be upon
you; for I die innocent. This so affected some of the
feeling Indians, that they let her depart in peace to her
own home. While I stood by the poor man, who had lost
his wife thus barbarously, I though I would say some-
thing to him for yelling in this manner, throwing his arms
about as he came along: but my Merciful Jesus made me
stand as one dumb, for the space of five minutes, and then
we parted, which seemed to confound the Indian more
than ten thousand words would have done. There was a youth with me in the chaise, who was
much surprised that I was not afraid; he said, There is
not a woman in this neighbourhood, who durst have gone
by that Indian, but I fear the Lord, who has made the
wildest beast of the field, and therefore, I trust He will
have compassion on me and preserve me from every harm:
but His Will be done. I have held this day, a meeting in a large barn, where
many assembled together. The attention of the people
was fixed upon me, which I labored to draw to that Gra-
cious God, who restored David’s soul, and led him in
The paths of righteousness for His Name’s sake. I told
my hearers they must pass through a death unto sin, if 
ever they walked in the paths of righteousness, or wit-
nessed a table spread for them in the midst of their ene-
mies, which by faith the Lord’s people partake of, eating
His Body, and drinking His Blood mystically. I think, without God had aided me in my soul and
body, it would have been impossible for me to support
under what I felt for the people this day, as they were
many of them in total darkness. Few are the number of
Christians in this part; but may they be increased by the
faithful labourers, exercising their graces upon the Merits
and Mercy of a Redeemer: for He it is who restoreth
from the fall, and maketh true Christians. I am anxious
for the kingdoms of this world, to become the Kingdom
of our Lord Jesus Christ. [Petersburg, 8th 8th mo. 1805.] From Petersburg, I returned back to Vernon this morn-
ing, and am rejoiced that I have got nearer Eternity, that
pleasant sound, the Saint’s delight. There I shall not
pass through one spiritual baptism for sinners, neither
feel the fatigue one moment that I go through now, be-
cause the children of men are so unlike their Maker, and
are swallowed up with trifles of meanest fort. In this
world the Kingdom of Grace is my glory: How much
more will it be in Eternity? There I shall never weep
for the would of men; nor feel pain, or weariness of flesh
or spirit, occasioned by moving to and fro, and refusing to
be comforted, knowing Israel’s seed is sifted over the
earth and fast bound in the captive chains of the devil;
but that happy day is hastening, when satan shall be
bound, and his power lost for a thousand years; then the
Lord my God will comfort His saints, and great shall be
their peace, who have laboured to build up Jesus Christ’s
Kingdom, by precept and example; doing and suffering
His Will from one year to another. May the purity of
my soul, qualify me to enjoy complete happiness in Christ,
in God, my only Friend, my sure support, when the mount
gains melt as wax before the fire, and all the proud shall
stand aghast, confounded by His Might. I tremble for
the unwise, when I contemplate their awful situation, 
when the Mediatorial Office of the Great High Priest will
be finished, Jesus no longer being appointed as Interces-
sir to plead with God for rebellious man. No: His Office
must be changed from an High Priest, to a Judge who
must pass sentence upon all the proud monarchs, all the
unrighteous nobles, judges, and the wicked of every de-
scription, who have despised His Clemency, and refused
the visitation of His Dying Love and Sovereign Mercy,
which have at last ceased, unto all the impenitent sons
and daughters, who choose death, darkness, horror, des-
pair, banishment from God and the holy angels, to become
servants of sin, and slaves to their own lusts forever,
being companions to the dragon, whose Tail drew a third
part of the stars, or angels of God after it, when he was cast
out of Heaven, in enmity to Jesus Christ, Heir of all
things, in Heaven and earth. [9th 8th mo. 1805, Vernon,
Oneida County.] As I was desiring the Lord to enlarge my coast, a
person came for me with a horse, to hold a meeting five
miles from this, so I immediately went, and found already
a people gathered in a barn. After sitting a little in
silence, I arose with the words of King David, The Lord
is my Shepherd, I shall not want. I felt renewed life
and power to rise in me, which covered the place; and
others bore testimony, that it was good for them to be
there. Having no where to lodge this night, a woman of
the name of Webster asked me home with her when the
congregation separated. The house was a small log one,
made with two places for light to come in, but no glass to
keep the air out; and it being a damp night, the cold
seized me, and my body was brought into affliction, which
made me groan under the weigh of a corruptible house,
that I shall be as glad to part with, as the log one. How
many times when I am comfortable, am I made restless
by the Spirit of the Living God, who moves me to stir up
the gift of faith in my heart, and thereby seek the lost,
that have wandered from the Sheepfold of Jesus Christ, my
Merciful Master, who ever excites His servants to suffer 
His Will, as well as delight to do it. My trials are many
and complicated, yet Though, Lord, deliverest my soul at all
seasons, out of the hand of the adversary, who seeketh
my life by various means, and has tried every new tempta-
tion to beguile and entangle my soul; knowing my delight
and glory is the overthrow of his kingdom of darkness,
in the hearts of poor sinners, whom I feel much for on
account of being misled by his base machinations, where-
with millions are undone, choosing to yield the members
of their bodies servants to sin, and their souls an habituation
myself called upon also, to exalt the Redeemer of the
world, as a Gracious, Long suffering God, full of pity to
the children of men, whose clemency is so great to all,
that each must be his own accuser at His Righteous Bar,
condemned by their reiterated sins, which have ben vio-
patins of His Just, and Holy Law, made to model the life
of man by, or that whereby his actions shall be examined:
for the Law is fixed in the heart of man, and therefore
many are a Law to themselves who never saw the Tables
of Stone, or read the Outward Letter. The Grace of our
Lord Jesus Christ hath appeared unto all men, teaching
them to deny themselves of all ungodliness, and wordily
lusts, that they may live soberly, righteously, and bodily
in this present evil world. [11th 8th mo. 1805.] Having rode five miles in the burning sun this morning,
I feel like Jonah, and mourned for a shade, as he did for
his pleasant Gourd, which withered away for his instruc-
tion. The person who went with me, left me in Stock-
bridge, at the house of Abraham Serjeant , who has been a
missionary to the Tribe of Indians nineteen years suc-
cessively, and since he first visited the Indians, he told
me It was thirty. Feeling much distressed by a violent
pain in my head, first with cold, and then with heat, I
could not take the satisfaction I would, in case I had been
of the Indian women, whom I felt dear to me. Kneeling
in the midst, my prayer was offered in faith for them and 
their children, that they might feel renewed by the Power
of the Holy Ghost, and live the true life of Faith. These
women could all understand English; and several of
them professed to be Born again. Eve, the oldest squaw,
said I have been Christian thirty years, being four-
score years old; yet walked one day to hear me perch four
miles, which my Master bid me reward her for it double.
I was sorry that it was not in my power to clothe them
with necessary things; for I had but four gowns, and I
gave them three of my little number, and from one dozen
pieces of new linen, I left but one change: so the God of
Heaven and Earth, put it into the hearts of my rich Chris-
tian sisters to supply my returning wants, when I go
among them; and above all, clothe my poor Red sisters
with the saint’s pure white linen, that I may meet them
in the Kingdom of our Lord Jesus Christ. I saw a white woman among the rest of the females,
who was from the State of New jersey, she was smoking,
and had two children named, being married to an Indian.
I was told that she had a third child, an infant; but last
winter it perished for want of clothes: poor babe! its
sorrows are at an end, and it is shining with the robe of
Jesu’s Righteousness! I told her, She ought to be a pat-
tern to the Indian women; and to induce her, I gave her
a long morning gown, to make her helpless children each
one, requesting Abraham Serjeant to let his daughter
make them: but he said It is too good. It will last
the better I replied, for being fine and good. Afterwards
I had the pleasure to see this white woman at a meeting:
for she with many others came a long way, and I had an
opportunity to preach repentance and Faith in Jesus
Christ, and was blessed in my own soul abundantly, for
feeling the miseries of my fellow-creatures in every direc-
tion, attending to the Spirit of God in me [12th 8th mo.
1805, Stockbridge.] Much concern I feel for the Indians here, as well
as for those I have mentioned: but those have better
houses, and have a school for their children, and many 
can speak English so as to be understood. I went to
their church, which is distinguished by a steeple, that
you can see some distance off. It is a neat, clean, wood
building, with glass windows, and a handsome entrance,
having a gallery all round excepting where the minister
sits. The minster took his seat in the pulpit, desiring
me to sit in a pew underneath, where three of his daugh-
ter sat along side of me, dressed as fashionable as any
women in middle rank, although there were but few to see
them, except the Indians, who all came with a blanket
round them, unless it were the young men and women,
who were foolishly hung with features, and head tires of
bright tin mettle. The Indians fantastically dressed,
sung a psalm feelingly, which moved my passion of love,
so that I wept all the time tears of joy. After this Abra-
ham Serjeant prayed in Indian, and then in English, and
gave out a second psalm, which was sung as the other ad-
mirably. The minister then read part of the fourteenth
chapter of Mark, which Captain Hendrick , a Chief, read
also in Indian; and I was at liberty to preach to them,
and had Captain Hendrick to interpret for me as long as I
thought proper, or in other words, while my Master furnish-
ed me with matter for the occasion, having desired Him
to be both Mouth and Wisdom to me, and also to lead me
to the passage which would be the most enlightening to
them: for I much delighted to be a messenger of peace
individually to them. My subject I took from Isaiah
who prophetically said, He was wounded for our trans-
gressions: He was bruised for our iniquities; the chas-
tisement of our peace was upon Him, and with His Stripes
we are healed. I felt alive in the Truth, therefore deliver-
ed each sentence with energetic love and streaming eyes,
shewing in what manner the Blessed Jesus was wounded
and bruised for us! I do not remember a time that I
could more freely excite to believe on Him by Faith,
which I told them was His Gift, and He would dispense
it to them if they would seek it by prayer, and avoiding
all sin that offended Him who was without sin: for He 
was an obedient Son, and never transgressed: yet the
Father laid upon Him the iniquity of us all. The ar-
dency of mind which I felt was great, and I am thankful
the spirit of prayer was imported to me, that I might in-
tercede thereby for the application of his Virtuous Blood,
which poured forth from His Wounds, when He hung a
Spectacle in the air, Dying for all Nations, who were
Made by Him. I gave Captain Hendrick my pocket book,
as I had not a crown to reward him with, for interpreta-
tion. When I came out, many of the Indians gladly took
me by the hand, which affectionately I saluted after the
same manner, knowing, One God was our Father, Re-
deemer, and Sanctifier of all, who are made whole with
His Stripes. I went a few miles, and held a second meeting in a
barn: for the people, in many places, have to assemble
thus, being not able to accommodate themselves better.
My text was, Master which is the first and great co-
mandment? The fervency of my spirit made me bold as
a lion, and I thought I could finish my life in exciting
them to love the Lord their God with all their heart,
soul, mind, and strength. This is my experience, said I,
and O that it was each of your’s! Several times I stood
silent, being powerfully prevented by weeping; no won-
der if some from this evening, love God with all their
heart, and keep me in remembrance, for the exercise of
my faith and prayer. The day was finished by riding five
miles alone, contemplating the Love of God in Christ to
me. [13th 8th mo. 1805, Vernon, Oneida County.] Appointments are made for me in five places, one for
each day; so my work follows me, though I feared being
kept idle. The insatiate thirst for souls which I feel,
is a thousand times more than for my daily bread, or ne-
cessary raiment, therefore I am continually brought into
perplexities and doubts for the different situations of my
hearers. In many corners here, I find some desiring to
know what they shall do to obtain Life Eternal; which I
am baptized for, as I pass along from one place to another, 
Surely, no one’s sorrows are equal to mine; because my
heart seems to share in the bitterness of everyone one whom
I mix with. I am going to the Centre, six miles from this, and my
feeble fabric can scarcely support itself; but obedience is
required if I faint by the way. This is consequence
of leaving some of my morning’s work to do at noon.
Take warning, O reader! and do the work of thy life sea-
sonably, then thou wilt be at liberty to rest in pain, and
thy vigorous hours will honour Him, who finished His
work at noon, by thirty-three, being Obedient all His Days.
Had I gone forth at the first call of my Heavenly Father,
my flesh and bones would now have rested in hope, and
my spirit entered the pearly gate of the City of the New
Jerusalem, which is free, and the Mother of us all, who
are sealed to the Day of Redemption, when our bodies shall
be raised from the dust and formed a celestial temple, for
the glorified soul and Spirit of the Living God to swell in
forever. It is sown a natural body, it is raised a spi-
ritual body. There is a natural body, and there is a
spiritiual body: and so it is written, The first a Adam
was made a living soul, the last Adam was made a quick-
ending spirit. And as we have borne the image of the
earthy, we shall also bear the image of the Heavenly:
For the trumpet shall sound; and the dead shall be
raised incorruptible, and we shall be changed. [14th 8th
mo. 1805, Vernon, Oneida County.] Samuel Kirkland , a Presbyterian missionary to the
Oneida Indians, called upon me this day to give me an
invitation to his residence. I felt unwilling for the pre-
sent to comply with his request; but my aged friend ap
peared determined to have me home with him. He said,
Skanando , the Old Oneida Chief, had come thirteen miles
after him, to bring me again, for my last Interpreter had
not done me justice, when I took my leave of them: be-
sides, he could not trust any so well as his old friend
Kirkland , who administered the bread and wine unto him;
being the only man, and Chief, who joined the Indians 
squaws in that holy ordinance: for the women are much
better than men, and have a greater knowledge of
God before their eyes, which preserves them from intoxi-
cation, and other evils, that the men are liable to be over-
taken with, when they are deprived of their reason by
strong drink. I told my friend Kirkland that I had
taken my leave of the Oneida Indians, but was willing to
go again in case they might be benefited. We parted,
and I rode with a sick head-ache to the Centre, six miles
off, and the first salutation I received was, that Many
were determined to hinder me of preaching, declaring a
woman had no right to preach. I was very still, and kept
silence till the way opened of itself, without my making
one effort to promote it; for the Lord stirred up a goodly
number, who positively said, I should preach, and if I
could not be accommodated with the Presbyterian church,
I should have the schoolhouse, as it was free for all. I
had no companion, and knew not one soul among all this
confusion: therefore I relied on the Arm of Jehovah, my
strong defence, and saw satan once more defeated by the
God of Jacob; for I had patiently waited for the Lord to
put him to flight who had rose up an host against me, to
cause me to be confounded before my opposers. As I had made the best of it that I could, strength
was given to me to evidence to all present that I feared none
but the Living God, saying in the midst of my subject,
Wo! be to me if I preach not the gospel, feeling as my
day of suffering was, my inward peace and power abound-
ed, which was a fresh manifestation of the Father’s Love
unto me, and confirmation that I still moved in the line of
my duty. When the meeting closed, six persons came unto me,
to request I would go with them, each having a horse; but
I was as much at a stand to know how I should dispose of
myself after meeting! as to comprehend how I should
obtain admission among them! One cried out, You must
go with me, another, She shall go with me, and my
friend Samuel Kirkland , missionary to the Oneida Indians, 
said, I have come six miles for her, and will not be ex-
cused from taking her to my house: therefore she must
come with me; for I have promised to take her to Oneida
next Sabbath, as Skanando , the old Chief, will not be
satisfied without it. The contest was finished, and I thought I was richly
rewarded for my faithfulness, having exhorted them to be
ready for the approach of the Bridgegroom, who would
come in such an hour as they thought not of. As I went
home with S. K. we had a very solemn die, and our tears
flowed reciprocally: for the Lord our God, had been with
us in ten thousand dangers, where death threatened us in
the most poignant manner. He told me that he has been
minister forty years, and twenty of that time he adopted
an Indian’s life, living among them for their benefit. When
his lot was first cast there, he was fixed with the best man
they had, who died a few days after; which they attri-
buted to him, and were determined to have revenge, life
for life. He said, I was commanded to fall asleep, and
a fire was prepared; but while they were all around me,
I kept singing hymns, trusting in God to deliver me, yet
they often said to me, Go to sleep, why do you sing?
at last one of the Chiefs was wright on, and made an
affecting speech, signifying, that This brother had fallen
down few steps short a few paces, were they to kill a white
brother for it, saying, It will bring innocent blood upon
our Nation if we kill him: therefore they hearkened unto
this Chief, and I was marvelously delivered from the jaws
of death. Another wonderful escape I had through the
goodness of God: I had taught a number of the young In-
dins to sing psalms, and they used to come and sing
with me, and I prayed, so that many of them were become
civilized, and did not like to go out among the warriors,
which enraged the men of war much, so that they agreed
to take my life from me, saying, I wanted to teach them
to milk, and hoe, and make women of them. The night
they fixed for putting me to death, I was fast asleep, and 
an old woman came and tried to wake me, knowing their
intention, crying, Up; up; up; many times, and then
left me; but being very sound, I did not regard what was
said unto me, and therefore lay still, till she came and
shook me by the shoulders, and said Up; up; flee; flee
for life; giving me a blanket to hide me; I run among
some thick bushes, and covered myself all over, laying
down under them, which I had no sooner done, but I
heard them march along, sounding through the woods,
singing their warlike songs and passed by me, to go to
the hut where I came from, and sought me with great
fury, threatening the aged woman that they would kill
her unless she would tell where I was, but she said I Was
not there, and then cried out pitiably, What! kill an
old granny! kill an old granny! so they went away, and
I remained to hide myself several days, until their rage
was pacified against me. I was pleased to hear the deliverance that God wrought
out for my friend, and remarked, that if he had been more
faithful, the Lord then would have blessed his labours
more abundantly, which he with tears acknowledged he
believed; yet said, I have seen fruit of my labour: for
there are thirteen women brought to believe on our Lord
Jesus, and Skanando , the old Chief, is a Christian, weep-
ing all the way. Let the time past suffice, I cried, but if
thou hadst only taken thought for the Indians, God would
have cared for thee and they children; and I am fully sensi-
ble that no one will ever profit the Indians unless they
can lay aside their own interest, and I am thankful that
thou hast done the good thou hast: but I wish though
wouldst let the time past suffice, and what they hand find-
set to do, do it with all they might. My aged brother, with
tears said he Would take my advice: for what I had
advanced was the truth; and I found great peace in de-
claring what I did, and hope that useful lesson, which the
Lord my God taught me by His Spirit to give him, will
be put in practice by myself, in every point of view, as
touching my spiritual labour in His Vineyard; for unless 
the heart is centred in Him, and weaned from all worldly
attainments, or earthly possessions, it is not possible that
He will honour us with spiritual riches, and qualify us to
bring home many souls to Him, as instruments in His own
Hands, to bring about that wonderful event, when the out-
pouring of His Spirit causeth All to know the Lord, from
the least unto the greatest. [15th 8th mo. 1805. Paris.] Eliza Kirkland , an amiable young woman, daughter
of S. K. took me in a chaise to a Quaker’s house, four
miles off, where I had a solemn meeting, which was in
a barn, and warned the scoffers there whom I felt for, lest
they should be of the number of such who would inward-
ly groan, saying, We fools thought their lives madness,
and their end to be without honour. It was a satisfacto-
ry time, notwithstanding some scorners being there. The
Quaker took me home to his house, where I abode that
night in great sorrow of mind for some of the family not
fearing God. The 16th I went to Brothertown, to collect the Indians
there together, in the school-house. My advice to them
was, Seek ye first the Kingdom of God and His Right-
eousness, and all these things shall be added unto you.
Which things I explained, were the necessaries of life, that
the Christians are entitled to, by the special promises and
care of our Heavenly Father, who watches over His chil-
dren from day to day. Those Indians were Baptists, di-
vided from two classes, one part believed in election, and
the other in free salvation. Where I was, they had re-
fused their minister, because they said They would not
worship such a cruel God as he served, as He only took
care of a part of his creatures, and drew this comparison,
by asking a question concerning their women: Would
not she be a cruel mother, who having two children,
took the one and nurse it; and left the other to perish?
so we will worship a God who takes care of all His chil-
dren; which I think was an excellent conclusion, and a
sound argument was advanced to shew how far an Indian
is capable of believing in the Living and True God, who 
is no Respecter of persons, further than they disregard his
Righteous Commandments and slight His offered mercy. After meeting, I rode eight miles, and slept very little
 in the night, by reason of poor accommodations, for we
all lodged in one room, where I could see the firmament
from a breach which had been made by fire. They sky at-
tracted my notice, and prevented my sleeping, as I had
not before met with such poor lodgings, yet I had the best
this miserable log house afforded, being welcome there. A large number assembled on the 17th for worship,
who had come, from two miles to ten round this neigh-
bourhood; but having no other place better than a school-
house, when it was full, the people came and requested
me to Go out into the open air, to accommodate them
who had come so far. I therefore got into a car, and
lift up my voice with authority, and said in the words of
my Lord and Master, Let your light so shine before
men that they may see your good works, and glorify your
father which is in Heaven. I was much favoured with
the Presence of God; for this opportunity required great
fortitude, as I never was before called to stand out i nthe
air, exposed to the burning sun, though I screened my-
self as well as I could. There is great courage also ne-
cessary for such a calling as this, which females are not
in general possessed of; because a false delicacy prevails
over the mind that is termed refinement, which shudders
at the very idea of standing a gazing stock to men of the
basset passions; unless they have been betrayed, and de-
sire to insnare their fellow-mortals, which is now become
so common, that a prudent woman must be very guarded
to sun the censure of the vulgar, if she wish to maintain
her character, as a virtuous woman, among mankind. When I had opened the passage, and stood a consider-
able time, I gave over, and was succeeded by one of my
sisters, who appeared astonished at me, and longed for a
vacant moment to testify, that, The spirit of prophecy
was not to continue always within the narrow limits of
our brotherhood, as male and female, are one in our Lord 
Jesus, when they become members of One Mystical Body,
even the Spiritual Body, or Bride of Christ, whom He
will remain Head of, or Bridgeroom to, forever, by law-
ful inheritance, having Swallowed up death in victory.
As soon as she had finished, I made way for another, by
sanctioning what was already advanced; and then, the
third time, I resumed my office, almost like a mother in
Israel, although but a babe, comparatively speaking. It
was a time whig will be remembered, I verily believe,
because no other person spoke, or prayed, but us three
women, who never had seen each other’s face before.
We witnessed according to this declaration, Where
the Spirit is, there is Liberty, and I am of opinion, if we
never see one another again in the flesh, we shall be ad-
kitted into that Mansion, where there is joy and pace,
and everlasting pleasure, to reward every soul, who have
denied themselves of all ungodliness, and worldy lusts,
and taken up the Cross of our Lord Jesus Christ. A person asked me home with her, two miles off,
whose name was Sloan, who was a tender hearted woman,
a Baptist by profession: thus I mix among all, regarding
no name, if only the image of Jesus Christ is there. I
had to lodge again in the same room where the whole fa-
mily were, it being a log house, with poor accomoda-
tions. One the 17th, William Sloan went with me from Au-
gusta to Stockbridge; and this merciful man having but
one horse, walked four long miles through the woods and
mud, to let me ride on his valuable creature. This person
was a Scotchman, who fought for the Americans, and in
the war received a ball that passed under his left should
blade to his back bone, where it has been twenty-eight
years. I offered him out of my little stock of money,
half a dollar, but he would only take two shillings. A meeting was held again in Stockbridge, for the in-
struction of the poor Natives, who are dear to me. There
are some of the Jersey Indians among this tribe, and the
whole number here, are rising three hundred, which infor-
mation I got from A. S. their minister. This day two of
the missionaries, and young clergyman were present,
while my soul was earnestly engaged for the good of the
Indians: but I verily believe by their proceedings, it was
their opinion that a woman ought not to preach: for one
of them said afterwards, had I Come to teach them to
knit and sew, it would be very well. From two until six,
I abode, and told them I hoped to see them among Christ’s
sheep at His Right Hand. The women presented me an
address, written by Capt. Hendrick , an Indian Chief, who
was my interpreter. This address was to shew their affec-
tion and gratitude, for crossing the Great Ocean, to call
them to the Fold of Jesus, which some already are in, be-
ing Lambs of His Care, and Sheep of His Pasture. I felt
sorry to be obliged to trouble A. S. for a horse, but if it be
ever in my power, I will reward him; and I am equally
obliged to him for his kindness, in setting me four miles
to Vernon, to the residence of my kind father Young. [19th 8th mo. 1805, Vernon, Oneida County.] AN ADDRESS
From the Women of the Muhheconnuk nation of Indians,
written on their behalf, in their native language, and
translated into English by Captain Hendrick , one of the
Indian chiefs, and presented to Dorothy Ripley, on her
departure from amongst them. DEAR SISTER, WE, the poor women of the Muhheconnuk nation,
wish to speak few words to you, to inform you, that while
our forefathers were sitting by the side of their ancient
fire-place, about eighty years ago, our father, Rev. Mr.
Sergeant’s father, came amongst them with the message
of the Great and Good Spirit, which he then began to de-
liver to them. He was the first minister of the gospel
that ever preached to our fathers, and the Great and Good
Spirit blessed his labours, by which means many of our
poor natives were turned from darkness to light. Our ancestors loved their minister, whom they looked 
upon as father, because he was willing to live and die with
them. Sister, We will also inform you, that since our father,
Mr. Sergeant ’s father died, he began to manifest a com-
passionate feeling towards our dismal situation; he in the
first place began to teach us to read and write, this he did
several years; after this he then began to deliver the word
of the Good Spirit, and his labours have been blessed, by
which means we who are commonly called by the white
people Squaws, are enquiring the way to Zion. Sister, While we were sitting by the side of our fire-
place here, we saw you coming, and when you opened
your mouth we believed you was sent by the Great and
Good Spirit to visit us (poor natives of this Island.) We
feel thankful to Him that He has put such a love in your
heart, that you was willing to undertake such a long and
tedious journey on the purpose to deliver His message to us.
We thank the Great Good Spirit that He has protected
you on the way, that you arrived here safely. Sister, In behalf of the rest of our woman, we now
heartily thank you for your kindness and for the pains you
have taken to visit us. We hope by the help of the Great Good Spirit, we shall
ever remember you, and the good words which you deli-
vered to us. Although we do not expect ever to see you
again, yet we believe that the Lord Jesus is able to help
us that we may hold out unto the end, that we may see you
among His Sheep on His Right, where we shall never be
parted again. May the Good Spirit protect you on your way, that
you may have pleasant journey unto the end, farewell. Lydia Suhquauwkhuh, or Hendrick .
 Catharine Quauquwchon .
 Eliz. Maukhtoaquauwusquch, or Jersey. 
 Catharine Quinney .
 Eve Knohtcaunmeu . In behalf of the rest. New Stockbridge. 19th August, 1805.
In the State of New York. Samuel Kirkland took me to have my appointment
fulfilled, which he engaged me to perform agreeable to the
request of Skanando , the old Chief, king of the Oneida nation
: but when I got there, the Presbyterian minis-
ter came, who said She had better teach them to knit
and sew, as preach to them, enquiring What apology
he should make to them for my preaching, as they did not
teach the Indians, that women had any right to preach?
I told him candidly, to Save himself trouble; for no
one had any business to interfere respecting this, since I
was accountable to no one but God, who had brought me
hither, neither was any answerable for what I did. I
was sitting in silence a little, with a large collection of
Indians, when this missionary walked in with a pompous
air into the pulpit, unlike a humble preacher of the
Righteousness of our Meek and Lowly Jesus: however, I
thought it best to set him an example of love, so permitted
him to partake of the opportunity, which had been merci-
fully prepared for me, by the Providential Mercy of God.
Woman why weepest though? whom seekest thou? was
my text, therefore I confined myself to my Indian sisters;
and told the men, as there were two preachers there, I
left them to the instruction of those missionaries; testi-
fying boldly, That if the disciplines had watched with the
same assiduousness, as Mary did at the Sepulchre, they
would have had the joyful tidings to preach, “That Jesus
Christ the Lord was Risen from the Dead;” this chagrined
the missionaries so much, who oppossed me among the
Indians, that I believe the next woman whom the Lord
sendeth, he will not dare to insult: for the Indian women
resented it with great indignation, having proved me their
sympathizing sister, who felt for their bodies and souls, and
desired no reward, further than their present peace. Samuel Kirkland , their stationed minister and father,
who had been with them forty years, acted as a kind bro-
ther to me, interpreting for me, as the Lord my God gave
ability to us each. Although satan was seeking an occa-
sion to sow tares, or make discord among us, I trust He 
would give this people to see where their help must come
from, as it appeared my duty to impress their minds with
the great obligation they owed to the Lord Jesus, who
waited to bring them into His Fold of Love, that He might
be their Merciful Shepherd, and Guide them as His Flock,
being The True Light, which eightieth every man that
cometh into the world. After we separated, I went to Skanando’s , the oldest
Chief’s house, where the good women all followed me,
that we might have another opportunity; for we had been
interrupted by the uncivil minister, who followed me with
my friend Kirkland ; but I was determined that there
should be none present, who wanted the true mark of
Christ’s Disciples, even Love: therefore told him to Go
away, and attend to his own preaching elsewhere, which
he did, when he found I was resolute and saw the displea-
sure which he had raised in the breasts of the women uni-
versally. S. K. rejoiced the heart of Skanando and the
women by telling them, If I were spared, I intended to
return back again to see them; and we had a favoured
time, with God’s parting blessing. Returning to Vernon, Calvin Young signified that I
Could go no where, that they were more wicked than
there, and requested me to stay a month longer, to have
meetings up and down, in the neighbourhood; and, as an
inducement, he proposed taking me to Albany in his car-
riage, with his wife, which was above one hundred miles
off, at the end of that period, having to go there: but en-
quiring of my Master Jesus, I was commanded to return
back, as my work was done there, and I was wanted else-
where. Knowing I had not money sufficient to pay my
expenses, I desired the Lord to incline the heart of my
generous friend to give me one dollar, which I thought
would be enough, with economy, to take me to Albany,
where the Lord had richly supplied me with money to come
thither. I was astonished immediately, when I acquaint-
ed my friend that I could not stay another day, that he
answered the desire of my heart so cheerfully, by taking 
a silver dollar out of his pocket, saying, Well, if you
will stay no longer, take this piece of money, which made
me burst into a flood of tears, and acknowledge, that No
sum of gold could ever reward him for his disinterested
love, and fatherly care over me, in a strange land, where
I knew no mortal when I came here; begging the Lord
to return his mercy upon his children; having three
amiable women, whom I loved as sisters, who were a cre-
dit to him, and his beloved wife, who with himself, will
ever be gratefully remembered, as friends raised up by
God, to answer His own Purpose by me; and I trust when
all the children of God will be received into the King-
dom, I shall see them, and hear it say unto them, among
His sheep, Verily I say unto you, in as much as ye have
done it unto one of the least of these my brethren, ye
have done it unto me. We parted with much affection,
and my friends gave me this letter to keep in remem-
brance their names. [20th 8th mo. 1805, Paris.] A testimonial received from Calvin Young , who introduc-
ed Dorothy Ripley to the Oneida Tribe, or Pagan
Party. Vernon, July 26, 1805. A LADY from England, by the name of Dorothy Rip-
ley, was introduced to me by a gentleman who came pas-
senger with her in the mail stage, for the purpose of
preaching to the Oneida and the neighbouring Indians.
On Sunday, the 28th, I had the pleasure of introducing her
to a part of the Oneida Tribe, called the Pagan party,
who believe not in the Christian Religion, but in worship-
ing the Great Spirit, by sacrificing and dancing. I in-
formed the Great Chief that she had come a great way to
preach to them. This Chief is called the Blacksmith , and
is a complete savage in every respect, and very envious
to the white people; but in this instance seemed to be
well pleased with her visit, and expressed himself in this
manner, That the white people generally came to them
under a pretence of friendship, that after they had obtained 
their object they were no more friends, but treated them
unkindly and destroy their property, but said he liked
the people called Quakers, that they were good people and
would do them no harm. After the meeting was over,
they generally expressed a wish that she would pay them
another visit. This is the only instance that I ever knew
this Chief to be pleased with white people coming amongst
them, or paying any attention to the preaching of the
Gospel. CALVIN YOUNG ,
 EVE YOUNG . My friends set me to Augusta, where I had a favoured
meeting, but was obliged to go into the woods, for the
house would not hold the people collected from various
motives. I sat in silence for some minutes, and then
stood upon the stump of a tree, and looking steadfastly at
a well dressed man, I pronounced those words, If they
hear not Moses, and the prophets, neither will they be
persuaded though one rose from the dead. I signified
there are such present, who neither believed in Moses,
nor the prophets; and although my soul was risen from
the dead spiritually, they would not give credit to it unless
they believed in the outward Record, which testified of
Him who was the Resurrection of soul, as well as body,
and who was beheld by the children of Israel, when Moses
lifted up the brazen serpent on a pole, for those stung by
serpents to behold, as though they beheld the Son of Man,
the Son of God lifted up, who should Cure the deadly
wound of the old serpent, even satan, who brought a spi-
ritual death into the souls of all, since the day that Adam
fell by disobeying the Righteous Commandment of the
Living God. I labored until I had no more strength,
either to pray or preach, as I thought, and therefore gave
over; and the man whom I particularly addressed, when
he could no longer stand the Truth, slipped off out of my
sight. i was told, He had been educated a Quaker; but
had not been at a meeting for religious worship for twenty 
years, being a professed Deist in this part, and made this
excuse for coming to day, “As it is a woman who is going
to preach, I will go and hear what she has to say:” there-
fore it was no wonder that the Merciful Jesus should find
him out among the multitude. Had I known the man
was a Deist, and despised the sect of religious professors,
I could not have reached him with a more suitable testi-
mony; but I am better pleased, that the Spirit, who
searcheth all things, directed my heart and eyes to him:
for he must think it strange, as I was not known by any
there. Coming out of the woods, many Besought me to return
back, as they had come unseasonably, four and six miles
distance; and did not know that the meeting was so early.
Standing to know the Will of my Gracious Master, I was
surprised with the Spirit of prayer, which came on me in
the twilling of an eye, and I supplicated Heaven for a
parting blessing upon this people, who had come to hear
a stranger, who had left all to follow Jesus, the Friend of
sinners; that I might be an instrument in His Hands to
seek out the lost sheep of the house of Israel. Isaac Wobby came for me, and we rode together six
miles, from Augusta to Paris. This man was an Indian
from Long-Island, who lives in Brothertown, and teaches
some of that Tribe, as God giveth him ability. He told
me he was converted fourteen years ago, and fell away,
and was very wicked; but since that, he was restored to
Divine Favour, and now enjoys the Love of Jesus Christ.
I rode on one of his horses, for the white people did not
lend me one, which I think was a great neglect, as I was
willing to spend my strength, and last breath in promo-
ting the Gospel of our Lord and Saviour, any where that
His Spirit leads me to suffer, or do His Will. Though I have in this part had many kind friends, yet
various have been my sorrows, which have come from un-
expected quarters, and from such who should heal, and
not try to wound. My friend Samuel Kirkland’s daugh-
ter Eliza , has treated me as a sister, and conducted me to 
Brothertown, where we had a very good meeting, at Isaac
Wobby’s place for worship, among the Close Communi-
cants, who are separated from the rest of their Baptist
brethren, called the Open Communicants, if I am rightly
informed. I had a meeting with the others before. The
Indians here strive to imitate the white people, and there
is no need of an interpreter, as they speak English. My
young friend took me back in her father’s chaise, which he
lent us, after meeting; as I have been much fatigued
with having to go beyond my strength: but to lay on a
good bed, in a comfortable clean house, revived my spirits,
knowing I was welcome there, and invited to tarry to rest
myself, and bring up my journal. The friendship of this
family, I desire to record to the honour of Samuel Kirk-
land and his wife Mary ; who sympathized with me in my
solitude, and administered a little comfit to my tribula-
ted spirit, which I offer my thanks unto the Lord my God,
who alone Has all Power, to open and shut the hearts He
Has made. Catharine Quachemut , an Indian sister, being much
grieved at the incivility of the missionary who opposed
women’s preaching, wrote me the following letter; and
then walked eight miles to bring it. A Letter from an Indian Squaw (woman,) addressed to
Dorothy Ripley , and received when in America. DEAR SISTER IN THE LORD, I BELIEVE that there is but One, the Only, the Living
and True God, and that he is the Maker and Preserver of
our lives, and upholder of all things here below, and that
he sent his Only Begotten Son into this world to be the
Saviour of mankind, and that all those who believe and
confess the Lord Jesus with their mouth, and believe in
their hearts, that God the Father of our Lord Jesus did
raise him up from the dead, shall he healed by His stripes,
as thou hast very well observed to us; and I hope and
pray God, that thou mayest be the means of stirring up
our stony hearts to turn unto Him, the Living and the 
True God, and that the words which thou has dropped
among us may take deep impression upon our hearts.
Dear Sister, be pleased to pray for us, that we may be
enabled through divine assistance to worship God in spirit
and in truth. I fully believe that thou art sent by the
Great and Good Spirit into this part of the world to do
good to thy fellow creatures, to preach the gospel unto
every kind of people; and although many people are led
to believe that it is not the duty of women to preach,
still I pray to God that thou mayest not be discouraged,
there being many infallible proofs in the scriptures of
women labouring in the gospel; one greatest encouragement
is, our Lord Jesus appeared to a woman first after His
Resurrection. I hope therefore my dear sister, thou may-
est keep on thy gospel labour, and may that Great and
Good Spirit who is able to protect thee by His Almighty
Power through all the changing scenes of this life, guide
thee by His Wisdom, and bless all they endeavors, and
crown them with success wheresoever He in His Wisdom
may cast thy lot. My dear sister, although we are uncertain whether
ever we shall see each other’s faces again, and though the
billows and the wide ocean may roll between us, still I
hope our hearts will be united together in love, and one
voice in glorifying God, and in celebrating His praises for
His unbounded Love for such vile creatures as we are.
And now my dear sister, as I a about to bid thee farewell,
I must beg of thee to remember me in thy prayers; as for
my part I shall never forget thee, but shall ever pray that
thou mayest be preserved through all they trials on this
earth, and be preserved by the Almighty’s protection to
arrive safely on thy native shore, and finally that we may
meet when our day’s work is done here, at the right hand
of God the Father, amongst the lambs of His fold, and
never to part again, which is the sincere prayer of thy
sister in the Lord, who wishes thy welfare both here and
hereafter. CATHARINE QUACHEMUT Neyuh DinnaukomuhNew Stockbridge, 8th mo. 19th, 1805. This woman, who is a Christian, went three hundred
miles to Philadelphia Yearly Meeting in 1802, when I was
there, the last time I was in the country. [Utica, 21st
8th mo. 1805.] This day I took my leave of Samuel Kirkland’s family,
whom I hope to meet in the Kingdom of our Lord Jesus
Christ, if I see them no more in time. Eliza was a very
pleasant companion, and assuaged my grief, in bringing
me hither in her father’s chaise, being almost spent: for I
have preached, prayed, and inwardly groaned so mud,
hungering and thirsting after Righteousness for the Indians
of the South Settlement, Oneida, Stockbridge, and Brother-
town, that they may know the Love of Jesus, and witness
the Power of God. I bid all those different Tribes adieu,
believing my seed sown among them, shall be watered by
Him who has richly provided for me, amidst so many
scenes of wo and poverty that my eyes have beheld. The white people, whom I have mixed among, are
principally dead in trespasses and sins; and have a worse
chance at salvation than their neighbouring brethren,
whom they despise; because they conceive themselves a
little better off than those; being able to contrive better
than they, who have laboured under so many disadvanta-
ges from the want of the peculiar Smile of an Indulgent
Parent, who will Justify all His Proceedings at the last,
and require of us all according to what knowledge he im-
parts. My friend Eliza Kirkland copied me this Address
at my request: for, I thought it proved the Indians are
capable of improvement when their day of knowledge ap-
proaches by the Special Providence of God, who setteth
up one and putteth down another, that it may be seen by
all, He Ruleth on earth as well as in Heaven, being the
Only Potentate, who seethe all things. [22d 8th mo. 1805,
Little Falls.] Speech of Peter , the Pagan, alias Sategealithea. A YOUNG Indian of the Pagan party, in a fit of in-
toxication, had attempted to stab with a tomahawk, a white 
man who had uniformly been friendly to Indians; he im-
mediately demanded redress, consequently a number of
the young man’s friends waited on the offended person,
and one of them made the following speech: it loses
much of its native beauty in the translation, owing to the wide
difference between the idioms of the two languages. Brothers of the Oneida Nation here convened; open
your ears and listen—you likewise, our brother the white
man, attend. Brothers, the preservation of our lives, to the bright
shining of the sun this morning, must be ascribed to God
our Maker, who resides in the Heavens, but extends the
Arm of His Power to all his creatures. Brothers, let us all be thankful and duly acknowledge
the Mercy of God our Creator. Brothers, the occasion of the present meeting reminds
us of the uncertainty of human life, and the instability of
man’s resolutions. Our brother, the white man, thinks he
narrowly escaped being killed by one of our men, so lately
as yesterday morning, this young Indian man but a
little while ago, made a solemn promise to refrain for
ever from the intoxicating draught, which disarms the man
of his right mind. Alas! how uncertain our enjoyments,
both as to life and its peace and quiet! had blood been
spilled, this day would have been darkness to us! and we
all buried in a flood of tears and grief! Let us all again
thank God, that no vein has been opened to endanger
human life; the wound of friendship can easily be hear led.
It is truly a grief to us, that the abuse was given to a man
who has always been friendly to us Indians, and never
did them an injury since the time he first came by their
fire-side. But other white-skins have whipped and beaten
some of us poor Indians, because of our frailties and fol-
lies; and chased them from their houses, with such whips
as they use upon refractory horses. Alas! how are the
times changed; in the days of the glory of our forefathers
it was not so, the language then was Brother walk in,
sit down, rest yourself, here is a dish, refresh yourself, 
and sleep by my fire-side. Brother White Man, be not
angry at what I say: though you individually may wash
your hands in innocence, the white skin race, as a body,
are become proud, and some of you too proud: you glory
in your riches, your great and commodious houses, your
large fields and your plenty; you wear a white shift, and
sometimes ruffled; and you despise us Indians, for our
poverty, our low huts, our scanty allowance, and our dirty
shirts: but brother white skin, do your people think that
God our Maker, who is in the Heavens, will make such a
discrimination in the end? Will the White man, with his
riches, his fine house, and his white clean shirt, fare so
much better than the poor Indian in his mean cottage,
with his dirty shirt, and tattered jacket? He looks not
only on the outside, but carefully examines what is within.
A foul spirit may be concealed in a body of gorgeously
clothed; and a pure heart may reside unseen in a body
covered only with a dirty, tattered garment. God our
Maker will judge right, in respect to the worth of souls,
whatever complexion the bodies wear. But Brother, be
not angry, I have rather stepped aside from the direct
object of our present meeting, and have been addressing
you as in the place of the white skin race at large. But
I am an Indian, and have lively feelings for my nation,
especially when I see them abused. I don’t think it is
right for the White people to give so much rum to the
Indians, when they know the weakness of Indians; and
that they are not blessed with that capacity and resolution
which some white people possess, who can make use of
strong drink, without inquiry to themselves, or disturbing
the peace of society. But I must remark, lest you should
be too much lifted up, that there are to be found among
white skinned people, some, or now and then one, who has
brought himself quite on a level with Indians. And if
we Indians must bear this reproach of loving rum, the
white man certainly loves money; which will deserve the
heaviest punishment, I presume not to determine. I consider myself as in the presence of God our Maker, 
who resides in the Heavens. Our father (Mr. Kirkland )
the Minister, sees and hears me. I can say, I believe he
is full of thoughts, and many anxious ones have revolved
in his mind, since this council was called. Brother, enough has been said; what is your wish?
tell us plainly! Do you want money to repair the breach
and heal the wound made in your heart? or do you prefer
a confession from the young man, who thus insulted you,
and a request for your forgiveness, promising before all
the Chiefs, that he will never do the like again? and can
you on these conditions, freely, and from the heart, forgive
him? if so, the Chiefs will be responsible for the young
man.” The latter proposition was accepted; a noble and
generous confession was made by the young Indian, and
he received the full pardon of the White Man, to the great
joy of all present. ELIZA KIRKLAND 
[Copied for her friend DOROTHY RIPLEY .] I feel very languid with riding 22 miles in the stage,
yet have appointed a meeting in the Presbyterian church,
which I held to great satisfaction, many people attending
from curiosity, which I hope will be profited, and my soul
free from their blood. As I was on my journey I knew
not how to get the day over, but comforted myself with
this prospect, Eternity is my resting place, where all my
joys will commence. A person of the name Alexander , who keeps store
here, invited me to sup and lodge; thus the Lord still
follows me with earthly mercies, which makes me pass
over many insults; and I had rather ten thousand pierced
me by vile reports, as myself be found once in the practice
of evil. To-morrow I purpose leaving here, though Wm.
Carr, Inn keeper, has told me if I tarry with them over
first day, to have a meeting, it shall be no expense to me.
My money I hope will hold out, that I may not want in
this quarter, where it seems so scarce; for I am more
ready to give to the necessitous than receive from such
who offer it. A kind Quaker, who heard me in Augusta, gave me
one dollar, which is the second I have received during five
weeks, and I have relieved three or four with it. This
friend attended a meeting before, and spoke admirably,
from the Dry bones in Ezekiel, which after he had done,
I arose and sanctioned it, as life and power were in the
testimony. When I sat down, he got up, and told that
people, his concern of this day had impressed his mind
twenty years, which he had believed it his duty to come
and pay them a visit: but the way never opened until that
time, which had relieved his spirit much. he again sat
down, and I resumed my place, feeling great love and
faith, with an ardent solicitude to benefit all present:
which stirred up the Gift of my aged brother, whom the
Lord sent after me to help in His vineyard: therefore,
our meeting continued long, and the people were favoured
to hear the sound of his voice the third time, which quick-
ened the fire of Celestial Love in my heart, so that I was
induced to supplicate the Throne of Mercy for preserva-
tion, and an increase of faith and love for each, when he
had closed his message, and then endeavoured to conclude
the meeting: but, a Methodist preacher requested I would
permit him to say something to the people, which I was
free to do, and he with tears told all present, to Trea-
sure up what they had heard; for Jesus Christ male and
female were one. When you go home, don’t you say as I
said last week, It is only a woman. My brethren and
sisters, I went to hear this woman in a barn, and the Word
reached me powerfully, and followed me home, and has
brought me miles to-day, to testify this among you; for
before this, I did not think a woman ought to preach: but
now I am convinced God has sent her to preach Jesus
Christ’s Gospel. This person sat down, and an Indian
sister rose immediately, and testified thus, If I was to
hold my tongue, and not tell that it is thirty-three years
since I became a Christian, those beams would speak 
against me: and I believe I may call this my sister: for
I think it is in the scriptures, that strangers shall be our
sisters, and I feel united to her. Much more was said
by this man and woman, which proved our gathering to-
gather was of the Lord, and we at last parted as children
of one Heavenly Father, who made us to love one another. [25th 8th mo. 1805, Albany.] Yesterday I had a long tiresome ride, which wearied
me exceedingly, and caused my spirits to feel great de-
pression, so that I knew not how to endure under the
pressure of morality, having felt great darkness covered
the minds of the people, as I passed along the road, from
village to village, in the stage! As I had but three shillings left, I thought I would go
and ask J. Taylor to give me lodgings: and he calmly re-
plied, I feel free, tell your wants to my wife and daugh-
ters: for it is my desire they should be kind to you. I
thought this a particular mark of the Love of God to me,
whom I have unbounded favours from. I suppose if my
money had not been spent, it would have been my inclina-
tion to abide at an Inn. When I sat down, two letters were given me from
my precious friend Abigail Eames , in New York, wherein
was testified great love and sympathy to a little one, and
a fresh supply of money from her and J—— E——— , who
had sent me a letter from N. Y. requesting me to call
upon an acquaintance of his in Albany for the sum of six
dollars, fearing my necessity would be great among the
Natives; but I could not feel free to take it of another in
his name, lest a bad use should be made of it: so he gave
it to a dear friend here, to hand me on my return, which
I am unfeignedly thankful for, unto my God, He being the
moving cause of this benevolence, and all other mercies
that I am blessed with. I could not sleep last night, for the Love of God to
me in those fresh instances of His care, in continuing me
the favour of my old friends, whom I esteem far above
rubies or fine gold. Abigail Eames is entitled to a daugh-
ter’s affection from me, because in sickness she forsook
me not: but performed a mother’s part to me, a stranger
in a strange land, when many passed by, and noticed not
the sorrows that came on me, to qualify me to seek the
salvation of mankind in general. Albany, New York State, 26th 8th mo. 1805. MY ENDEARED FRIEND A. E. , LAST evening I returned from my visit to the Indians
of Oneida, South Settlement, Stockbridge, and Brother-
town, and I was presented with two letters from thee,
whom I am united to by the strongest ties of Christian
friendship, that will no doubt end in the full felicity of
our spirits, when they enter into the City of our God.
Here our joys are mixed with pain; our love with anxious
desire, that causes bitterness of spirit, through a separa-
tion: but in Heaven, one Object will attract our notice,
even the Spiritual Bridegroom, who is now the Head of
the Invisible Church, as well as the Visible One, which
we are members of. Since we were parted, many have
been the baptisms my soul hath endured for the children
of men, while I have travelled five hundred miles, and
have had above thirty appointments, which were held in
the Court-house, Steeple-houses, School-rooms, Barns,
Fields, or Woods; yet there has been sufficient time for
me to think of my precious A. E. although I assure thee, I
watch with a godly jealousy over my natural affections,
lest I give to thee, or any other sincere acquaintance,
more than is due to mutable creatures. Thou must ac-
knowledge God, the Father of us each, is entitled to our
ardency of soul, and continual thoughts; and I believe, as
we are more weaned from terrestrial objects (in whom we
should place no confidence) we shall have our minds sub-
jected, and lay passively in His Hand, doing His Will, and
suffering patiently for His sake, while employing the
whole of our time, which I imagine though dost call One
business. If I were to indulge myself in expression at
this time, I should use strong tender words to thee: but I 
must forbear, or else the past uneasiness will return,
which Grace has conquered by her attractive charms,
when solitary saying, I hope my precious friend hath not
forgot me. When I came hither, a little money was acceptable
from such who were disposed to watch my necessity, so
far distant as New York. Please to present my love and
thanks to J. E. for his care in supplying my present ne-
cessity; tell him I had not quite an half dollar, and I
hope this will be returned when he is on an errand of love
for my Master Jesus. I have been much tried with J. T .
this evening. He told me scornfully, I might do to in-
struct the Indians, or Blacks; but said, As for white
people, they have good preachers, and enough of preach-
ing from them. My answer was, I had rather teach the
Indians and Africans, than white people: for their souls
were more precious to me, having suffered much for them.
He then told me thus, You are on the Pinnacle, and as for
your talents they are very small, though you think much
of yourself. Why he spoke after this manner was, be-
cause I faithfully let him know, he was but half a Chris-
tian, although he had been a Methodist almost twenty
years. I made him no further answer, but went to my
trunk, and prepared for leaving them to-morrow, while he
continued talking all the time, which I suppose was to
provoke me; and then he finished the day, with family
prayer. I thought his place was, to lay his had on his
mouth, not daring to utter words before God, whom I am
certain will repove him for this conduct; but I pray the
Long suffering Father, not to lay this sin to his charge, for
the sake of Him, who became a Sin Offering in our stead,
that the folly of man might be passed over. I am bound
under new obligations to the Lord, to serve Him with my
reaming strength, while a probationer in time; for His
Delivering Goodness, and Mercy, that is magnified in my
preservation thus far: knowing that by my own ability,
it was not possible to pass through such complicated ex-
ercises as have fallen to my lot, during this year, which 
the annuals of Eternity will shew forth, when my day’s
work is finished to the Glory of King Jesus, my Everlast-
ing Spouse, whom I adore in the temple of my soul. I
would rehearse to thee, many of the blessings of my life,
since our separation; but hope thou wilt be spared, to read
the dealings of my God in my journal; which I have re-
corded to honour Him forever: as, He by His Spirit di-
rected thereunto, when on the brink of the grave, raised
up for the Special Purpose of shewing forth His Love,
Mercy, Power, and Goodness, to the children of men. With much affection I conclude, and remain thy sin-
cere sister in the Lord Jesus Christ. DOROTHY RIPLEY . 29th 8th mo. 1805, on board of Sloop
William, to New York. I have been two nights in this sloop, which Captain
L. Hackstaff commands. We have three passengers be-
sides myself, and one is a complete Deist. Openly he
said, I have been a Methodist, Presbyterian, Univer-
salist, and now am a Deist. I told him I believed he
would make another change before he died yet: What
is that? he cried, A Christian, my answer was; for I
had felt uncommonly distressed about him, before he so
daringly said he was thus changeable; and I have a hope
that satan will be disappointed of this bold servant of his
 whom he employs to lay waste the Religion of the Re-
deemer of the World. I shall say right, if add, I never
saw one so profane before, yet have faith in Jesus Christ
to believe for him, knowing all things are possible to him
that believeth; and it may be, that the Lord will deliver
his soul out of the gin, which he blindly has been insnar-
ed with; being in gross darkness, and under the power
of temptation. It is probable that we shall get into New
York in a few hours, and then his language will not cause
my soul to be exceeding sorrowful! no; I shall be with
some of the righteous, where we shall recount the Lord's
tender Mercies since our separation. How dismal is my
 situation, when I am but one day with the ungodly!
What then would Eternity be, if it were to spend with
them? O for a pure spirit! that I may behold my God
forever! O for an holy soul and body! that I may adore
Him, who by His Wisdom, strengthened me, to Choose
the good, and refuse the evil. This is a beautiful river
we are going down: but my heart is in Heaven, and all
earthly things are too mean to divert me (this moment)
from my inheritance, which fadeth not away. My rest
draws near, and sorrow will soon take its flight, and joys
rapay the tedious days I mourn for sinners. In all my ways, I long to speak good of the Name of
my God, who leads me by His Spirit, and protects me from
the rage of the dragon, who insults me often by his agents,
when I am obliged to reprove them for sin, and exhort
them to repentance, and believe on the Lamb of God
which taketh away the sin of the world. I am under
a necessity of paying my vow unto the Lord; of render-
 ing Him my grateful thanks for the preservation of my
life;and although my stock of raiment is reduced much,
 by contributing to the wants of my Indian sisters; yet I
am blessed with this consideration, that my heart was
 open to relieve them with such as the Lord made me a
steward over: therefore, I may expect the True Riches
of His Kingdom in return, as no one hitherto hath been
kind enough to give me the last piece of raiment, in tra-
velling six hundrend and sixty miles. Array me with
the royal vestment of innocence, that I may worship with
the angels, Thee, whom my soul loveth intensely: so that
at Thy request, I can follow Thee every where, strength-
ened by Thee, to complete that which Thou dost design
me to do, for Thy poor dying mortals like myself, who
live, to ripen for Eternity; or, as fewel, will be cast into
the fiery furnace, where there is wailing and gnashing of
teeth. In seven weeks, I have finished this arduous journey,
setting off alone, in the Name of Abraham's God, who
took care of him, when he went forth at the Voice of His
Command, to view the land, which afterwards he gave him 
 by promise to reward his faith, and crown his hope; his
children were inheriting it, from generation to generation, until
they were driven out of it, for the lack of wisdom, and
rebellion. O my soul! praise God for the Gift of Faith,
and obedience to live in His Fear, so shalt thou possess
the Land of Light, Life, and Peace, which Abraham's obe-
dience entitled him to forever, which was typified by the
outward Canaan, that his seed did inherit, by the special
Promise of Jehovah, who conversed with him from Hea-
ven. I am surrounded with angelic spirits, who seem to
encourage me to be faithful a little longer, then Abraham
the father of the faithful, will see one, who went out at the
Command of God, not knowing whither she went, but as
the Spirit directed her feet in righteousness, to seek the
 lost sheep of the house of Israel. [New York, 31st 8th
mo. 1805.] 